District of Columbia statutes.
24-1002

Additional duties of Mayor.

The Mayor shall do all things necessary and incidental to the execution of the compact.

May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-230, § 3, 35 DCR 7736
May 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-122, § 3, 37 DCR 30
1981 Ed., § 24-1002.